Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1507.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-706.30 of Title 63, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


Each year from October 1 through March 1 of the following year,


and in accordance with the latest recommendations of the Advisory


Committee on Immunization Practices of the Centers for Disease


Control and Prevention, each hospital shall offer, prior to


discharge, vaccinations against influenza virus to all inpatients



Req. No. 2647 Page 1


sixty-five (65) years of age or older, unless contraindicated, and


contingent upon the availability of the vaccine.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective October 1, 2026.




60-2-2647 DC 1/9/2026 11:33:26 PM







































Req. No. 2647 Page 2